Louisiana, session 2026, HB552.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:1894.1(A) and (B) and 1894.2(A)(introductory paragraph) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1894.1. Driving while intoxicated or impaired,; prosecutions for violation required
to be filed under general state law; city and municipal courts
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, prosecutions
in any city, parish, or municipal court based on or arising out of the operation of a
vehicle by a person while intoxicated or impaired may be charged and prosecuted
under pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 14:98 or under any applicable city, parish,
or municipal ordinance that incorporates the standards, elements, and sentences of
the offense of driving while intoxicated or impaired contained in R.S. 14:98. Any
conviction for a first or second offense or the entry of a plea of guilty and sentence
based on such plea or the forfeiture of bail of any person having been charged with
a first or second violation of R.S. 14:98 in any such city, parish, or municipal court
shall be punishable in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 14:98(D)(1) or (2),
whichever is applicable. Any conviction for a first or second offense or the entry of
a plea of guilty and sentence based on such plea or the forfeiture of bail of any
person having been charged with a first or second violation of the applicable city,
parish, or municipal ordinance in any such city, parish, or municipal court shall be
punishable in accordance with the provisions of the ordinance and shall constitute
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 552 ENROLLED
a conviction under pursuant to R.S. 14:98 for purposes of determining the number
of prior convictions in a proceeding under R.S. 14:98.
B. For purposes of this Section, all city, parish, and municipal courts shall
have concurrent jurisdiction with the district courts over violations otherwise subject
to their jurisdiction provided for by R.S. 14:98, except in those cases wherein the
person or defendant is charged as a third or subsequent offender under the provisions
of R.S. 14:98(D)(3) or (D)(4), whichever is applicable. If the charge is for a third or
subsequent offense, the prosecution shall be had only in the district court and the
defendant shall have the right to a trial by jury. However, mayors' courts shall have
no jurisdiction whatsoever over violations as provided for by R.S. 14:98, nor to the
trial of offenses against municipal ordinances relative to prosecutions on charges of
driving while intoxicated or impaired.
* * *
§1894.2. Additional costs; certain violations
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and in
addition to any fines, forfeitures, costs, or penalties, a person convicted of a felony,
a misdemeanor, or a violation of local ordinance, including a traffic felony,
misdemeanor, or local traffic violation, shall be assessed an additional cost in any
matter where the use of alcohol was a factor involved in the commission of a crime.
Any court that designates by rule, divisions, or sections of the court as a specialized
division or section having subject matter jurisdiction for alcohol related offenses
including driving while intoxicated or impaired, shall assess the following costs:
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 32:662.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§662.1. Admissibility
In all criminal cases where intoxication or impairment is an issue, any
certificate or writing made in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 32:663,
including but not limited to intoxilyzer instrument recertification forms, and other
certificates or writings made with respect to the chemical analyses of a person's
blood, urine, breath, or other bodily substance, shall be admissible as evidence.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 552 ENROLLED
Section 3. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 814(A)(9) and (10) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 814. Responsive verdicts; in particular
A. The only responsive verdicts which may be rendered when the indictment
charges the following offenses are:
* * *
9. Vehicular negligent injuring:
Guilty.
Guilty of negligent injuring.
Guilty of operating a vehicle while intoxicated or impaired.
Not guilty.
10. First degree vehicular negligent injuring:
Guilty.
Guilty of vehicular negligent injuring.
Guilty of negligent injuring.
Guilty of operating a vehicle while intoxicated or impaired.
Not guilty.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.